data/da_DK.aff
FLAG num
#Substantiv, konsonantfordobling, fælleskøn, -Ø i flertal 
SFX 267 Y 80 
SFX 267 0 ben/944 b	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 bens/944 b	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 bene/944 b	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 benes/944 b	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 cen/944 c	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 cens/944 c	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 cene/944 c	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 cenes/944 c	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 den/944 d	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 dens/944 d	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 dene/944 d	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 denes/944 d	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 fen/944 f	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 fens/944 f	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 fene/944 f	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 fenes/944 f	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 gen/944 g	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 gens/944 g	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 gene/944 g	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 genes/944 g	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 hen/944 h	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 hens/944 h	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 hene/944 h	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 henes/944 h	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 jen/944 j	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 jens/944 j	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 jene/944 j	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 jenes/944 j	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 ken/944 k	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 kens/944 k	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 kene/944 k	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 kenes/944 k	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 len/944 l	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 lens/944 l	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 lene/944 l	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 lenes/944 l	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 men/944 m	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 mens/944 m	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 mene/944 m	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 menes/944 m	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 nen/944 n	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 nens/944 n	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 nene/944 n	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 nenes/944 n	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 pen/944 p	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 pens/944 p	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 pene/944 p	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 penes/944 p	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 qen/944 q	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 qens/944 q	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 qene/944 q	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 qenes/944 q	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 ren/944 r	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 rens/944 r	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 rene/944 r	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 renes/944 r	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 sen/944 s	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 sens/944 s	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 sene/944 s	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 senes/944 s	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 ten/944 t	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 tens/944 t	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 tene/944 t	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 tenes/944 t	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 ven/944 v	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 vens/944 v	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 vene/944 v	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 venes/944 v	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 wen/944 w	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 wens/944 w	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 wene/944 w	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 wenes/944 w	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 xen/944 x	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 xens/944 x	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 xene/944 x	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 xenes/944 x	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 zen/944 z	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 zens/944 z	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 zene/944 z	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 zenes/944 z	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING

#Adjektiv, svagt bøjet, intetkøn
SFX 366 Y 1
SFX 366 0 t/70,944 [^t]	+BESTEMT_ENTAL
#Apostrof, fælleskøn
SFX 401 Y 1
SFX 401 0 '/53,7,73,70,945 .
#Apostrof, intetkøn
SFX 402 Y 1
SFX 402 0 '/53,10,73,70,945 .
#Apostrof NeedAffix

#Sammensætning, fugeelement -
SFX 466 Y 2
SFX 466 0 -/942,945 .
SFX 466 0 -/943,945 .
